Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Chapter 8.1. Financial Responsibility.

§ 5.1-88.1.
Proof of financial responsibility to be furnished for each aircraft.

No aircraft, as defined in § 5.1-1 except a public aircraft or a balloon shall be registered by the Department unless and until the applicant thereof furnishes proof of financial responsibility in the amounts required by this chapter for each aircraft for which a registration is applied for.

History.

Code 1950, § 5.1-83; 1968, c. 773; 1970, c. 707; 1979, c. 272; 1988, c. 588; 2017, c. 793.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793 substituted “registered” for “licensed” and “registration” for “license.”

§ 5.1-88.2.
What constitutes proof of financial responsibility.

The following shall constitute proof of financial responsibility as required by § 5.1-88.1:

The issuance, by an insurance company licensed to write such insurance in this Commonwealth, of a policy or policies of bodily injury and property damage liability insurance, or a policy or policies written pursuant to Chapter 48 (§

38.2-4805.1

et seq.) of Title 38.2 that provide coverage with respect to each such aircraft in the amount of $50,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, including passenger liability, and $100,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, including passenger liability, and to a limit of $25,000 because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident; or a single limit policy in the sum of $250,000, covering bodily injury and property damage liability in any one accident, including passenger liability of $50,000 per passenger seat; or

The execution of a bond by the registrant and by a surety company authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth conditioned for payment in amounts and under the same circumstances as would be required in a policy of bodily injury liability and property damage liability insurance, as required by the provisions of subdivision A 1; or

The delivery to the Department of $250,000 in cash or an irrevocable letter of credit in the amount of $250,000 from a depository institution as defined in §

2.2-4701

. Such money or securities so delivered to the Department shall be placed by it in the custody of the State Treasurer and shall be subject to execution to satisfy any judgment within the limits on amounts required by this chapter for personal injury and property damage liability insurance.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this section, for an aircraft commonly known as an “ultralight,” as the same is now and may hereafter be defined by the Federal Aviation Administration, the proof of financial responsibility required by § 5.1-88.1 may be satisfied by the issuance as to that aircraft of a single limit insurance policy in the sum of $100,000 covering bodily injury and property damage liability in any one accident, that is issued by an insurance company licensed to write such insurance in this Commonwealth or written pursuant to Chapter 48 (§

38.2-4805.1

et seq.) of Title 38.2.

History.

Code 1950, § 5.1-84; 1968, c. 773; 1970, c. 707; 1979, c. 272; 1984, c. 169; 1992, c. 810; 2005, c. 451; 2007, c. 207; 2017, c. 793.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 451 substituted “Title 38.2 that provide” for “Title 38.2, which provide” in subdivision A 1; in subsection B, deleted “by an insurance company licensed to write such insurance in this Commonwealth” following “aircraft” and inserted “that is issued by an insurance company licensed to write such insurance in this Commonwealth or written pursuant to Chapter 48 (§

38.2-4800

et seq.) of Title 38.2.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 207 rewrote the first sentence of subdivision A 3.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 793, in subdivision A 2, substituted “registrant” for “licensee” and deleted “of this section” following “provisions of subdivision A 1.”

§ 5.1-88.3.
Certain sections of Code incorporated by reference; definitions.

The provisions of §§

46.2-424

,

46.2-447

,

46.2-448

,

46.2-449

,

46.2-450

,

46.2-451

,

46.2-452

,

46.2-456

,

46.2-457

,

46.2-458

,

46.2-461

, and

46.2-463

shall apply to all policies of insurance or other evidence of financial responsibility furnished hereunder except that whenever the word “Commissioner” appears in any of said sections it shall be taken to mean the Director of the Department of Aviation; and whenever the word “Department” or “Department of Motor Vehicles” appears, it shall be taken to mean as well the Department of Aviation.

History.

Code 1950, § 5.1-86; 1968, c. 773; 1970, c. 707; 1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-88.4.
Cancellation of insurance or corporate surety bond.

No policy of insurance or corporate surety bond issued pursuant to this chapter may be canceled or terminated, except for nonpayment of premiums, until at least thirty days after notice of cancellation or termination of said policy of insurance or corporate surety bond has been filed in the office of the Department, except that a subsequent policy or corporate surety bond procured and certified to the Department shall on the effective date thereof terminate the insurance or corporate surety bond previously in effect with respect to any aircraft designated in both policies or corporate surety bonds.

History.

Code 1950, § 5.1-87; 1968, c. 773; 1970, c. 707; 1979, c. 272.

§ 5.1-88.5.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 588.

§ 5.1-88.6.
Parachute jump training schools; disclosure of liability insurance coverage; penalty.

Every person operating a parachute jump training school in the Commonwealth shall disclose to his students whether he has obtained, and is maintaining, personal injury liability insurance, as defined in §

38.2-117

, for the benefit and protection of such students during their training.

The disclosure required by this section shall be in writing and provided to every student prior to the commencement of any training.

Any person failing to provide the disclosure required by this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1993, c. 46.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1993 act having been 5.1-88.5.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.